ja: ビールの種類: アルトビール; アンバー・レッドエール; アメリカンペールエール (APA); バーレーワイン; ベルギーエール; ビター; ブラウンエール; ダークラガー; ダークウィートビール・デュンケルヴァイツェン; イングリッシュペールエール (EPA); フルーツランビック; ジャーマンラガー; ゴールデンエール; ゴーゼ; グーズ; インディアペールエール (IPA); クリーク; ケルシュ; ラガー; ランビック; ペールラガー; ピルスナー; ポーター; セゾンエール; 燻製ビール・ラオホビア; サワーエール; スタウト; ストロングエール; ストロングビター; 小麦ビール/ヴァイツェンビール; 白ビール/ヴィットビール; その他
th: ลักษณะเบียร์: อัลท์เบียร์; เบียร์สีอำพัน/สีแดง; เพลเอลสไตล์อเมริกัน (APA); บาร์เลย์ไวน์; เบียร์เบลเยียม; ขม; เบียร์สีน้ำตาล; เบียร์ลาเกอร์ดำ; ดาร์กวีตเบียร์/ดุงเกลไวเซ่น; เบียร์อังกฤษสีอ่อน (EPA); แลมบิคผลไม้; เบียร์เยอรมัน; เบียร์สีทอง; โกเซ่; เกิร์ซ; เบียร์อินเดียสีอ่อน (IPA); ครี๊ก; คอลช์; เบียร์ลาเกอร์; แลมบิก; เพลลาเกอร์; พิลส์เนอร์; พอร์เตอร์; เซซอนเอล; เบียร์รมควัน/เราค์เบียร์; เบียร์เปรี้ยว; สเตาท์; เบียร์ที่ไม่ผ่านการหมัก; สตรองบิทเทอร์; เบียร์ข้าวสาลี/ไวเซนเบียร์; เบียร์ขาว/วิทเบียร์; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Сорт на бирата: Altbier; Кехлибарен/червен ейл; Американски светъл ейл (APA); Barleywine; Белгийски ейл; Горчива; Кафяв ейл; Тъмен лагер; Тъмна пшенична бира/Dunkelweizen; Английски светъл ейл (EPA); Плодов ламбик; Немски лагер; Златен ейл; Gose; Gueuze; Индийски светъл ейл (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Лагер; Ламбик; Светъл лагер; Пилзнер; Портър; Сезонен ейл; Пушена бира/Rauchbier; Кисел ейл; Стаут; Силен ейл; Силно горчива; Пшенична бира/Weizenbier; Бяла бира/Witbier; Други
el: Ποικιλία μπύρας: Altbier; Καστανή/Κόκκινη ale; American pale ale (APA); Οίνος από κριθάρι; Βελγική ale; Πικρή; Μαύρη ale; Σκούρα lager; Σκούρα σταρένια μπύρα/Dunkelweizen; English pale ale (EPA); Φρουτώδης lambic; Γερμανική lager; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Καπνιστή μπύρα/Rauchbier; Όξινη ale; Stout; Δυνατή ale; Δυνατή και πικρή; Σταρένια μπύρα/Weizenbier; Λευκή μπύρα/Witbier; Άλλο
vi: Loại bia: Bia Altbier; Bia lên men chậm/bia nhạt; Bia nhạt màu của Mỹ (APA); Bia lúa mạch; Kiểu Bỉ; Đắng; Bia nâu; Bia mạch nha rang khói; Bia lúa mì đen/Bia đen; Bia nhạt kiểu Anh; Bia ủ Lambic trái cây; Bia lên men kiểu Đức; Bia thủ công; Bia Gose; Bia Gueuze; Bia nhạt kiểu Ấn (IPA); Bia Kriek; Bia Kölsch; Bia lên men; Bia Lambic; Bia nhẹ; Bia Pilsner; Bia đen ủ mạch nha và hoa bia; Bia nhạt Saison; Bia hun khói/Bia mạnh; Bia chua; Bia đen lên men; Bia mạnh; Bia vị đắng; Bia lúa mì/lúa mì chưa lọc; Bia lúa mì lên men/Bia lúa mì ít đắng; Khác
da: Ølvariant: Altbier; Amber/Red ale; American pale ale (APA); Bygvin; Belgisk ale; Bitter; Brown ale; Mørk pilsner; Mørk hvedeøl/Dunkelweizen; English pale ale (EPA); Frugt lambic; Tysk pilsner; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Pilsner; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Røget øl/Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Hvedeøl/Weizenbier; Hvidtøl/Witbier; Andet
pl: Odmiana piwa: Altbier; Bursztynowe/czerwone ale; Amerykańskie pale ale (APA); Wino jęczmienne; Belgijskie ale; Gorzkie; Ciemne ale; Ciemny lager; Ciemne piwo pszeniczne/Dunkelweizen; Angielskie pale ale (EPA); Owocowy lambic; Niemiecki lager; Złote ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Wędzone piwo/Rauchbier; Kwaśne piwo; Stout; Mocne ale; Mocne z goryczką; Piwo pszeniczne/Weizenbier; Piwo białe/Witbier; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Odroda piva: Altbier; Jantárové/červené pivo; Americké svetlé pivo (APA); Barleywine; Belgické pivo; Horký; Hnedé pivo; Tmavý ležiak; Tmavé pšeničné pivo/Dunkelweizen; Anglické svetlé pivo (EPA); Ovocný lambik; Nemecký ležiak; Zlaté pivo; Gose; Gueuze; Indické svetlé pivo (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Ležiak; Lambik; Svetlý ležiak; Plzeň; Porter; Pivo typu Saison; Údené pivo/Rauchbier; Kyslé pivo; Stout; Silné pivo; Silne horké; Pšeničné pivo/Weizenbier; Biele pivo/Witbier; Iné
de: Auswahl an Bier: Altbier; Amber/Red Ale; American Pale Ale (APA); Barley Wine; Belgian Ale; Bitter; Brown Ale; Dunkles Lager; Dunkles Weizen; English Pale Ale (EPA); Frucht-Lambic; Deutsches Lager; Golden Ale; Gose; Gueuze; India Pale Ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Helles Lagerbier; Pilsner; Porter; Saison Ale; Rauchbier; Sour Ale; Stout; Strong Ale; Strong Bitter; Weizenbier; Witbier; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 啤酒品种: 老式啤酒; 琥珀色/红色爱尔啤酒; 美式淡色艾尔 (APA); 大麦酒; 比利时爱尔啤酒; 苦味; 棕色爱尔啤酒; 黑啤; 黑小麦啤酒/Dunkelweizen; 英式淡色爱尔啤酒 (EPA); 水果兰比克; 德国啤酒; 金色爱尔啤酒; 哥塞啤酒; 贵兹啤酒; 印度淡色爱尔啤酒 (IPA); 克里克啤酒; 科隆啤酒; 淡啤酒; 兰比克啤酒; 拉格淡啤酒; 比尔森啤酒; 搬运工; 季节啤酒; 烟熏啤酒/Rauchbier; 酸爱尔啤酒; 司陶特啤酒; 高度爱尔啤酒; 烈性苦啤; 小麦啤酒/Weizenbier; 白啤酒/Witbier; 其他
lt-LT: Alaus rūšis: Altbier; Gintarinis / raudonasis elis; Amerikietiškas šviesusis elis (APA); Miežių vynas; Belgiškas elis; Kartus; Rudasis elis; Tamsusis lageris; Tamsus kvietinis alus / Dunkelweizen; Angliškas šviesusis elis (EPA); Vaisių skonio lambikas; Vokiškas lageris; Auksinis elis; Gose; Gueuze; Indijos šviesusis elis (IPA); Kriekas; Kiolšas; Lageris; Lambikas; Šviesusis lageris; Pilsneris; Porteris; „Saison“ stiliaus elis; Rūkytas alus / Rauchbier; Rūgštusis elis; Stautas; Stiprus alus; Stiprusis biteris; Kvietinis alus / Weizenbier; Baltas alus / Witbier; Kita
nl: Biervariant: Altbier; Amber/rood bier; Amerikaans pale ale (APA); Gerstwijn; Belgisch bier; Bitter; Bruin bier; Donker pils; Donker witbier/Dunkelweizen; Engelse pale ale (EPA); Fruitlambiek; Duits pils; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; Indiase pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsener; Porter; Saison; Rookbier/Rauchbier; Zuurbier; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Witbier/Weizenbier; Witbier; Andere
ko: 맥주 종류: 알트비어; 앰버/레드 에일; 아메리칸 페일 에일(APA); 보리와인; 벨기에 에일; 쓴맛; 브라운 에일; 다크 라거; 흑밀맥주/둔켈바이젠; 잉글리시 페일 에일(EPA); 과일 람빅; 독일 라거; 골든 에일; 고제; 괴즈; 인디아 페일 에일(IPA); 크릭; 쾰쉬; 라거; 람빅; 페일 라거; 필스너; 포터; 세종 에일; 훈제맥주/라우흐비어; 사워 에일; 스타우트; 강한 에일; 강한 쓴맛; 밀맥주/바이젠비어; 화이트 맥주/위트비어; 기타
zh-TW: 啤酒種類: 老啤酒; 琥珀/紅啤啤酒; 美國淡色愛爾啤酒 (APA); 英式淺色愛爾啤酒; 比利時愛爾啤酒; 苦的; 棕色愛爾啤酒; 黑啤酒; 深色小麥啤酒/Dunkelweizen; 英式淡色愛爾啤酒 (EPA); 蘭比克啤酒; 德國啤酒; 金色艾爾啤酒; 鹽小麥啤酒; 調和式酸啤酒; 印度淡色艾爾 (IPA); 櫻桃; 科隆啤酒; 拉格啤酒; 蘭比克; 淡啤酒; 皮爾森啤酒; 波特啤酒; 季節啤酒; 煙燻啤酒; 酸愛爾啤酒; 黑濁啤酒; 強愛爾啤酒; 強苦愛爾啤酒; 小麥啤酒/Weizenbier; 白啤酒/Witbier; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta piva: Altbier; Jantarno/crveno pivo; Američko svijetlo pivo (APA); Ječmeno vino; Belgijsko pivo; Gorko; Smeđe pivo; Tamno lager pivo; Tamno pšenično pivo / Dunkelweizen; Englesko svijetlo pivo (EPA); Voćno lambic pivo; Njemačko lager pivo; Zlatno pivo; Gose; Gueuze; Indijsko svijetlo pivo (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Svijetlo lager pivo; Pilsner; Porter; Saison; Dimljeno pivo / Rauchbier; Kiselo pivo; Stout; Jako pivo; Intenzivno gorko; Pšenično pivo / Weizenbier; Bijelo pivo / Witbier; Ostalo
fi: Olutvalikoima: Altbier; Amber/red ale; Amerikkalainen pale ale (APA); Barley wine; Belgialainen ale; Bitter; Brown ale; Tumma lager; Tumma vehnäolut / Dunkelweizen; Englantilainen pale ale (EPA); Hedelmä-lambic; Saksalainen lager; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; Intian pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Vaalea lager; Pilsner; Portteri; Saison ale; Savuolut/Rauchbier; Hapan ale; Stout; Vahva ale; Vahva bitter; Vehnäolut/Weizenbier; Valkoinen olut / Witbier; Muu
pt-PT: Variedade de cerveja: Altbier; Cerveja Amber/Red ale; American Pale Ale (APA); Cerveja Barleywine; Cerveja belga; Amarga; Cerveja Brown ale; Cerveja preta; Cerveja de trigo escuro/Dunkelweizen; Cerveja pale ale inglesa; Fruit Lambic; Cerveja alemã; Cerveja Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; Cerveja pale ale indiana; Kriek; Kölsch; Cerveja; Lambic; Pale Lager; Pilsner; Cerveja Porter; Saison Ale; Cerveja fumada/Rauchbier; Cerveja Sour ale; Stout; Cerveja Strong Ale; Cerveja Strong bitter; Cerveja de trigo/Weizenbier; Cerveja branca/Witbier; Outro
hu: Sör fajtája: Altbier; Amber/Red ale; Amerikai pale ale (APA); Barleywine; Belga ale; Bitter; Barna ale; Sötét lager; Sötét búzasör/Dunkelweizen; Angol pale ale (EPA); Gyümölcsös lambic; Német láger; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; Indiai pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Füstölt sör/Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Búzasör/Weizenbier; Fehér sör/Witbier; Egyéb
es: Variedad de cerveza: Altbier; Amber/Red ale; Pale ale americana (APA); Vino de cebada; Belgian ale; Amarga; Brown ale; Dark lager; Cerveza de trigo oscura/Dunkelweizen; English pale ale (EPA); Lambic de frutas; German lager; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Lager pálida; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Cerveza ahumada/Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Cerveza de trigo/Weizenbier; Cerveza blanca/Witbier; Otros
it: Varietà di birra: Altbier; Birra ambrata/rossa; Birra chiara americana (APA); Barleywine; Birra belga; Amaro; Birra prodotta con malto marrone; Birra scura; Birra di frumento scura/Dunkelweizen; Birra chiara inglese (EPA); Lambic alla frutta; Birra chiara tedesca; Birra chiara; Gose; Gueuze; Birra chiara indiana (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Birra chiara; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Birra affumicata/Rauchbier; Birra acida; Stout; Birra forte; Amara forte; Birra di frumento/Weizenbier; Birra bianca/Witbier; Altro
en: Beer variety: Altbier; Amber/Red ale; American pale ale (APA); Barleywine; Belgian ale; Bitter; Brown ale; Dark lager; Dark wheat beer/Dunkelweizen; English pale ale (EPA); Fruit lambic; German lager; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Smoked beer/Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Wheat beer/Weizenbier; White beer/Witbier; Other
tr: Bira Çeşitleri: Altbier; Amber/Kırmızı bira; American pale ale (APA); Arpa şarabı; Belçika birası; Acı; Kahverengi bira; Koyu lager; Koyu buğday birası/Dunkelweizen; English pale ale (EPA); Meyveli lambic; Alman lager birası; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; İsli bira/Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Buğday birası/Weizenbier; Beyaz bira/Witbier; Diğer
ro-RO: Sortiment de bere: Altbier; Bere de tip ale de culoarea ambrei/roșie; American Pale Ale (APA); Barleywine; Bere tip ale belgiană; Amară; Bere brună; Bere brună de tip lager; Bere brună din grâu/Dunkelweizen; English Pale Ale (EPA); Bere lambic din fructe; Bere lager germană; Bere de tip ale aurie; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison Ale; Bere afumată/Rauchbier; Bere tip ale acră; Stout; Bere tip ale tare; Bere amară cu conținut ridicat de alcool; Bere din grâu/Weizenbier; Bere albă/Witbier; Altele
sv: Ölsort: Altbier; Amber/röd ale; Amerikansk pale ale (APA); Kornvin; Belgisk ale; Bitter; Brun ale; Mörk lager; Mörkt veteöl/Dunkelweizen; Engelsk pale ale (EPA); Frukt lambic; Tysk lager; Gyllene ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Rököl/Rauchbier; Sur ale; Stout; Stark ale; Stark bitter; Veteöl/Weizenbier; Vitöl/Witbier; Annat
ru: Стиль пива: Альтбир; Янтарный/красный эль; Американский пэйл эль (APA); Барливайн; Бельгийский эль; Биттер; Коричневый эль; Темный лагер; Темное пшеничное пиво / Dunkelweizen; Английский пэйл эль (EPA); Фруктовый ламбик; Немецкий лагер; Золотой эль; Гозе; Гёз; Индийский пэйл эль (IPA); Крик; Кёльш; Лагер; Ламбик; Пейл-эль; Пилснер; Портер; Сезонный эль; Копченое пиво / раухбир; Кислый эль; Стаут; Крепкий эль; Крепкий биттер; Пшеничное пиво / вайсбир; Белое пиво / витбир; Другое
cs: Druh piva: Altbier; Amber/Red ale; American pale ale (APA); Ječné víno; Belgian ale; Hořké; Brown ale; Tmavý ležák; Tmavé pšeničné pivo / Dunkelweizen; English pale ale (EPA); Ovocný lambik; Německý světlý ležák; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Světlý ležák; Lambik; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Kouřové pivo / Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Strong bitter; Pšeničné pivo / Weizenbier; Pšeničné pivo / Witbier; Jiné
nb: Ølvariant: Altbier; Amber/Red ale; Amerikansk pale ale (APA); Barleywine; Belgisk ale; Bitter; Brown ale; Mørk lager; Mørkt hveteøl/Dunkelweizen; Engelsk pale ale (EPA); Fruit lambic; Tysk lager; Golden ale; Gose; Gueuze; India pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Røkt øl/Rauchbier; Sour ale; Stout; Strong ale; Sterk bitter; Hveteøl/Weizenbier; Hvit øl/Witbier; Annen
sl-SI: Vrsta piva: Altbier; Jantarjev/rdeči ale; Ameriški pale ale (APA); Ječmenovo vino; Belgijski ale; Grenek; Rjavi ale; Temni lager; Temno pšenično pivo/Dunkelweizen; Angleški pale ale (EPA); Sadni lambic; Nemški lager; Zlati ale; Gose; Gueuze; indijski pale ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Lager; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Porter; Saison ale; Dimljeno pivo/Rauchbier; Kislo pivo; Stout; Močno pivo; Močna grenkoba; Pšenično pivo/Weizenbier; Belo pivo/Witbier; Drugo
fr: Variété de bière: Altbier; Bière ambrée/rousse; Bière pâle américaine (APA); Vin d’orge; Bière belge; Amer; Bière brune; Bière blonde foncée; Bière de blé brune/Dunkelweizen; Bière blonde anglaise (EPA); Lambic aux fruits; Bière blonde allemande; Bière dorée; Gosé; Gueuze; Bière India Pale Ale (IPA); Kriek; Kölsch; Bière blonde; Lambic; Bière blonde; Pilsner; Bière Porter; Bière de saison; Bière fumée/Rauchbier; Bière aigre; Stout; Bière forte; Fort amer; Bière blanche/Weizenbier; Bière blanche/Witbier; Autre
pt-BR: Variedade de cerveja: Altbier; Cerveja âmbar/vermelha; American pale ale (APA); Vinho de cevada; Cerveja belga; Bitter; Cerveja marrom; Cerveja escura; Cerveja de trigo escuro/Dunkelweizen; Cerveja EPA (English pale ale); Fruit lambic; Cerveja alemã; Cerveja dourada; Gose; Gueuze; IPA (India Pale Ale); Kriek; Kölsch; Cerveja; Lambic; Pale lager; Pilsner; Carregador; Saison ale; Cerveja defumada/Rauchbier; Cerveja azeda; Cerveja preta; Cerveja forte; Cerveja forte amarga; Cerveja de trigo/Weizenbier; Cerveja branca/Witbier; Outro